src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51seitsemästredekiljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittätredekiljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltätredekiljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillätredekiljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletredekiljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetredekiljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistätredekiljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinätredekiljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientredekiljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintredekiljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissätredekiljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintredekiljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettredekiljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsinätredekiljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitredekiljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettätredekiljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltätredekiljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellätredekiljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletredekiljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestätredekiljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenätredekiljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentredekiljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentredekiljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessätredekiljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stredekiljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttätredekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitredekiljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemästriljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittätriljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltätriljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillätriljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletriljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetriljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistätriljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinätriljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientriljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintriljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissätriljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintriljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettriljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsinätriljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitriljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettätriljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltätriljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellätriljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletriljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestätriljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenätriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentriljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentriljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessätriljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:striljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttätriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitriljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemästriljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittätriljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltätriljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillätriljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletriljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetriljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistätriljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinätriljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientriljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintriljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissätriljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintriljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettriljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsinätriljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitriljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettätriljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltätriljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellätriljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletriljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestätriljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenätriljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentriljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentriljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessätriljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:striljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttätriljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitriljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemästsiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittätsiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltätsiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillätsiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletsiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetsiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistätsiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinätsiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientsiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintsiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissätsiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintsiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettsiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsinätsiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitsiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettätsiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltätsiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellätsiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletsiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestätsiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenätsiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentsiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentsiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessätsiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stsiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttätsiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitsiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51seitsemästsiljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittätsiljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltätsiljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillätsiljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletsiljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetsiljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistätsiljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinätsiljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientsiljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintsiljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissätsiljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintsiljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettsiljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsinätsiljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitsiljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettätsiljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltätsiljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellätsiljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletsiljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestätsiljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenätsiljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentsiljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentsiljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessätsiljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stsiljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttätsiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitsiljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
seitsemästredekiljoonas+Num:seitsemä  NUM_51seitsemästredekiljoonas  ;
seitsemästriljardis+Num:seitsemä  NUM_51seitsemästriljardis  ;
seitsemästriljoonas+Num:seitsemä  NUM_51seitsemästriljoonas  ;
seitsemästsiljardis+Num:seitsemä  NUM_51seitsemästsiljardis  ;
seitsemästsiljoonas+Num:seitsemä  NUM_51seitsemästsiljoonas  ;
